Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 2 Narcotic Treatment Programs Enforcement

Effective date. —

This article became effective May 4, 2017.

26-5-40.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Narcotic Treatment Programs Enforcement Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-41.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Community Health or its successor.

“Governing body” means the county board of health, the partnership, the corporation, the association, or the person or group of persons who maintains and controls a narcotic treatment program, who is legally responsible for its operation, and who holds the license to operate that program.

“License” means the official permit issued by the department that authorizes the holder to operate a narcotic treatment program for the term provided therein.

“Licensee” means any person holding a license issued by the department under this article.

“Narcotic treatment program” means any system of treatment provided for chronic heroin or opiate-like drug-dependent individuals that administers narcotic drugs under physicians’ orders either for detoxification purposes or for maintenance treatment in a rehabilitative context offered by any county board of health, partnership, corporation, association, or person or groups of persons engaged in such administration.

“Patient” means any individual who undergoes treatment in a narcotic treatment program.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 26/SB 365.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in paragraph (1).

26-5-42.
Minimum standards of quality and services.

The department shall create and promulgate reasonable and necessary minimum standards of quality and services for narcotic treatment programs. At least the following areas shall be covered in the rules and regulations:

Adequate and safe buildings or housing facilities where programs are offered;

Adequate equipment for the delivery of programs;

Sufficient trained or experienced staff who are competent in the duties they are to perform;

The content and quality of services to be provided;

Requirements for intake, discharge, and aftercare of drug dependent persons;

Referral to other appropriate agencies;

Continuing evaluation of the effectiveness of programs;

Maintenance of adequate records on each drug dependent person treated or advised;

A formal plan of cooperation with other programs in the state to allow for continuity of care for drug dependent persons; and

Criteria for providing priority in access to services and admissions to programs for drug dependent pregnant females.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-43.
Rules and regulations.

The department is authorized and directed to create and promulgate all rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-44.
License required.

No governing body shall operate a narcotic treatment program without having a valid license or provisional license issued pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-45.
Application; proof of compliance.

Application for a license to operate a narcotic treatment program shall be submitted by the governing body to the department in the manner prescribed by rules and regulations and shall contain a comprehensive outline of the program to be offered by the applicant.

Proof of compliance with all applicable federal and state laws for the handling and dispensing of drugs and all state and local health, safety, sanitation, building, and zoning codes shall be attached to the narcotic treatment application submitted to the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-46.
Application period; required letter of intent.

The department shall establish an annual or biannual open enrollment period to accept applications for narcotic treatment programs.

The department shall establish an information forum for potential applicants prior to the beginning of the open enrollment period that shall be no less than 14 days prior to the start of the open enrollment period. It shall be mandatory for a representative of a prospective applicant for such open enrollment period to attend the information forum. Failure to attend and comply with such record of attendance requirements shall disqualify any applicant from consideration during open enrollment.

It shall be mandatory for an applicant to submit a letter of intent stating such applicant’s intention to apply for a narcotic treatment program license. Such letter of intent shall include the intended address and region location. The letter shall be delivered to the department at least seven days prior to the beginning of the open enrollment period.

The first open enrollment period shall be held December 1, 2017, through December 31, 2017, and the department shall not accept any applications for licensure until December 1, 2017.

After the first open enrollment period, the department shall administratively determine the annual or biannual open enrollment period no later than December 1 of the preceding calendar year.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-47.
Application review and requirements; nontransferability.

The department shall, consistent with the requirements of this Code section, establish an application review process committee. The members of the committee shall include representation from department staff members and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities.

Application requirements shall include, but not be limited to:

Data and details regarding treatment and counseling plans;

Biographical information and qualifications of owners, medical directors, counselors, and other required staff;

Data as determined by the department on currently licensed narcotic treatment programs within the region of the proposed location and within a 75 mile radius, whether or not such other programs are outside of the region;

Patient levels of currently licensed programs in the proposed region of care and within 75 miles, including:

The number of patients admitted to current narcotic treatment programs in the most recent month; and

The number of patients served by current narcotic treatment programs in the most recent month;

Data on demographic, social, health, economic, alcohol and drug related crimes, alcohol and drug overdoses, and hospital and emergency department admissions of individuals addicted to opioids for the program location;

Applicant experience operating a narcotic treatment program or working at such program, including a complete history of such experience both within this state and in any other state;

Program ownership in other locations, if any, including a complete and accurate description of narcotic treatment program experience, including whether the applicant currently holds, has held, or has had revoked any licenses, registrations, enrollments, accreditations, contracts, and network memberships. The applicant shall disclose any adverse actions against the applicant while employed by or as a result of ownership of a narcotic treatment program;

Evidence the applicant sought community input for the proposed location from substance abuse advocacy organizations, civic organizations, neighborhood associations, locally elected officials, and other groups;

Proof of notification of intent to file an application with all law enforcement offices within a 25 mile radius of the program location;

Proof of notification of intent to file an application with all drug courts within a 75 mile radius of the program location;

A narrative description of and information about adjoining businesses and occupancies within 200 feet of the facility, including a description of transportation access, traffic patterns, security features, local area police and crime reports, and neighborhood safety; and

A complete description of the facility’s staff and patient parking.

A program license shall be nontransferable for a change of a governing body. The department shall require currently operating programs that have a change of governing body to submit an application for such change in accordance with its rules and regulations. However, the department shall waive Code Section 26-5-46, all other requirements under this Code section, and Code Section 26-5-48 if such governing body is in good standing with the department.

A program license shall be nontransferable for a change of location. The department shall require currently operating programs that have a change of location to submit an application for such change in accordance with its rules and regulations. However, the department shall waive the application requirements for a change of location of a currently operating program pursuant to Code Section 26-5-46, all other requirements under this Code section, and Code Section 26-5-48 if such governing body is in good standing with the department, provided the change of location is within such program’s current region established by this article.

Upon application for an additional program by a current licensee, each location operated by such licensee shall be inspected. Any such location inspected within the preceding 36 months shall be exempt from such inspection requirement of this subsection. Such inspections are in addition to all other application requirements for an additional program application by such licensee.

In the event an applicant is unable to obtain patient information from current programs as required by subsection (b) of this Code section, the department may direct current narcotic treatment programs to provide such information to the applicant.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 26/SB 365.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, inserted “information” in paragraph (b)(2); substituted “admissions” for “admission” in paragraph (b)(5); substituted “or has had” for “or had” in the first sentence of paragraph (b)(7); and substituted “this Code section” for “the Code section” in subsection (e).

26-5-48.
Prerequisites to licensing; limits on licenses; waivers; creation of regions.

Prior to the department issuing a license to a governing body for any narcotic treatment program, the program shall demonstrate the following:

Compliance with all state and federal law and regulations;

Compliance with all applicable standards of practice;

Program structure for successful service delivery; and

Impact on the delivery of opioid treatment services of the applicant in the applicable population.

The department shall issue a license to a governing body for any narcotic treatment program which meets all the rules and regulations for such program and the licensing of such program does not exceed four licensed treatment programs per region pursuant to subsection (h) of this Code section.

The department will evaluate the applications based on data submitted as required by Code Section 26-5-47.

Applications for licensure submitted to the department prior to June 1, 2016, shall not be subject to Code Section 26-5-46 or 26-5-47.

Programs licensed on or before June 30, 2017, are not subject to the regional maximum allowable program limitations pursuant to this Code section. However, if a region has four or more licensed programs on or after July 1, 2017, such region shall be considered to have reached its maximum allowable programs.

The department shall establish a review process to determine if a waiver should be granted to an applicant and allow an application to be submitted for review in a region that has four or more licensed narcotic treatment programs. The department shall have full authority to determine the requirements that must be met for a waiver to be considered for review.

In the event that the department receives multiple letters of intent before an open enrollment period for a specific region and the ensuing applications will lead to the regional license limit being exceeded, the department shall have the authority to develop a scoring system for the applications submitted and approve a program or programs determined to be most fit for licensure. The department shall develop an appeal process for those applications not selected under such scoring system.

For the purpose of narcotic treatment program application evaluation for the department and delivery of services by narcotic treatment programs in communities and to citizens of this state and for the purpose of establishing narcotic treatment programs regional boundaries, there are created 49 regions with those counties designated as follows:

Region 1 shall be composed of Dade, Catoosa, Walker, and Chattooga counties;

Region 2 shall be composed of Whitfield and Murray counties;

Region 3 shall be composed of Gordon and Bartow counties;

Region 4 shall be composed of Floyd County;

Region 5 shall be composed of Polk and Haralson counties;

Region 6 shall be composed of Paulding County;

Region 7 shall be composed of Cobb County;

Region 8 shall be composed of Douglas County;

Region 9 shall be composed of Fulton County;

Region 10 shall be composed of Cherokee County;

Region 11 shall be composed of Forsyth County;

Region 12 shall be composed of Fannin, Gilmer, and Pickens counties;

Region 13 shall be composed of Towns, Union, Lumpkin, and White counties;

Region 14 shall be composed of Rabun, Habersham, and Stephens counties;

Region 15 shall be composed of Hart, Franklin, Elbert, Oglethorpe, and Madison counties;

Region 16 shall be composed of Banks, Jackson, and Barrow counties;

Region 17 shall be composed of Hall and Dawson counties;

Region 18 shall be composed of Gwinnett County;

Region 19 shall be composed of DeKalb County;

Region 20 shall be composed of Clayton County;

Region 21 shall be composed of Henry County;

Region 22 shall be composed of Rockdale County;

Region 23 shall be composed of Clarke and Oconee counties;

Region 24 shall be composed of Walton and Newton counties;

Region 25 shall be composed of Wilkes, Lincoln, Taliaferro, McDuffie, Warren, and Glascock counties;

Region 26 shall be composed of Columbia, Richmond, and Burke counties;

Region 27 shall be composed of Greene, Morgan, Hancock, Putnam, Jasper, Jones, Baldwin, and Wilkinson counties;

Region 28 shall be composed of Butts, Lamar, and Monroe counties;

Region 29 shall be composed of Fayette, Spalding, Pike, and Upson counties;

Region 30 shall be composed of Carroll, Heard, Troup, Coweta, and Meriwether counties;

Region 31 shall be composed of Muscogee, Harris, Talbot, Taylor, Marion, and Chattahoochee counties;

Region 32 shall be composed of Bibb, Crawford, and Twiggs counties;

Region 33 shall be composed of Houston and Peach counties;

Region 34 shall be composed of Laurens, Johnson, and Treutlen counties;

Region 35 shall be composed of Washington, Jefferson, Emanuel, Candler, and Toombs counties;

Region 36 shall be composed of Jenkins, Screven, Bulloch, and Effingham counties;

Region 37 shall be composed of Chatham County;

Region 38 shall be composed of Bryan, Liberty, McIntosh, Long, Tattnall, and Evans counties;

Region 39 shall be composed of Glynn, Camden, Wayne, Appling, and Jeff Davis counties;

Region 40 shall be composed of Dodge, Telfair, Montgomery, Wheeler, Bleckley, and Pulaski counties;

Region 41 shall be composed of Charlton, Ware, Brantley, Pierce, Bacon, and Coffee counties;

Region 42 shall be composed of Clinch, Atkinson, Lanier, Berrien, and Cook counties;

Region 43 shall be composed of Lowndes, Colquitt, Echols, Brooks, and Thomas counties;

Region 44 shall be composed of Tift, Turner, Irwin, and Worth counties;

Region 45 shall be composed of Dooly, Crisp, Ben Hill, and Wilcox counties;

Region 46 shall be composed of Dougherty County;

Region 47 shall be composed of Lee, Sumter, Macon, Schley, Webster, and Stewart counties;

Region 48 shall be composed of Calhoun, Baker, Mitchell, Decatur, and Grady counties; and

Region 49 shall be composed of Terrell, Randolph, Quitman, Clay, Early, Miller, and Seminole counties.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-49.
Rewards and financial incentives prohibited.

Narcotic treatment programs shall not provide a bounty, free services, free medication, or other rewards for patient referral to such program.

Narcotic treatment programs shall not provide temporary discounted financial incentives to a potential patient that does not conform to the schedule of fees established by such program as required by the department’s rules and regulations.

Narcotic treatment programs shall not provide discounted fees for services during the first 90 days of treatment.

Subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section shall not apply to drug dependent pregnant females.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-50.
Compliance with zoning requirements.

Narcotic treatment programs shall fully comply with local zoning requirements.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-51.
Providing of records.

Subject to the limitations of Code Section 26-5-56, the department may require at reasonable intervals that each licensee shall furnish copies of complete records of each person treated or advised by the narcotic treatment program; provided, however, that patient identifying information shall be redacted from such records prior to submission to the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-52.
Inspections.

Each licensee shall permit the authorized department representatives to enter upon and inspect any and all premises upon or in which a program is to be conducted or for which a license has been applied so that verification of compliance with all relevant laws or regulations can be made.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-53.
Denial, suspension, or revocation of license.

The department may deny any license applied for under this article that does not fulfill the minimum requirements which the department shall prescribe by rules and regulations and may suspend or revoke a license which has been issued if an applicant or a licensee violates any of such rules and regulations; provided, however, that before any order is entered denying a license applied for or suspending or revoking a license previously granted, the applicant or licensee, as the case may be, shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing as provided for in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-54.
Notice.

Notice of a proposed suspension or revocation of a license shall be provided in writing by the department to any licensee so affected within 90 days after the open enrollment period has closed or the grounds are discovered. Within ten days from receipt of such notice, the licensee so affected may request a hearing before the department. Upon receipt of such request for hearing in proper form, the department shall schedule a hearing within a reasonable time, but not later than 90 days.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-55.
Administrative Procedure Act.

The promulgation of reasonable and necessary rules and regulations, the conduct of administrative hearings, and judicial review of the department’s actions shall be subject to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-56.
Confidentiality of patient information.

For the purpose of providing more effective treatment and rehabilitation, the records and name of any drug dependent person who seeks or obtains treatment, therapeutic advice, or counsel from any program licensed under this chapter shall be confidential and shall not be revealed except to the extent authorized in writing by the drug dependent person affected; furthermore, any communication by such drug dependent person to an authorized employee of any holder of a license shall be deemed confidential; provided, however, that, except for matters privileged under other laws of this state, the records of such person and information about such person shall be produced in response to a valid court order of any court of competent jurisdiction after a full and fair show-cause hearing and in response to a departmental request for access for licensing purposes when such request is accompanied by a written statement that no record of patient identifying information will be made.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-57.
Enforcement of article.

The department is authorized to enforce this article and the rules and regulations promulgated under this article by injunction. Any violation of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated under this article shall be a nuisance per se; and it shall not be necessary to allege or prove the exhaustion of remedies at law to obtain an injunction under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-57

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-58.
Violations of article.

Any person who violates any provision of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-58

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-59.
Priority admissions policy for pregnant females.

Any program licensed or funded by the department under this article shall implement a priority admissions policy for the treatment of drug dependent pregnant females which provides for immediate access to services for any such female applying for admission, which access shall be contingent only upon the availability of space.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-59

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-60.
Central registry.

To prevent simultaneous enrollment of a patient in more than one program, all programs shall comply with the policies and participate in the central registry operated by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities. Programs shall comply with the rules and regulations of the department regarding the central registry.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

26-5-61.
Records check application.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Administrator” means the individual designated by the program’s governing body who is responsible for the on-going and day-to-day operations of the program, for overall compliance with federal, state, and local laws and regulations regarding the operation of narcotic treatment programs, and for all program employees including practitioners, agents, or other persons providing services at the program.

“Applicant” means any individual affiliated with a partnership, corporation, association or individuals or groups of individuals submitting an application to operate a narcotic treatment program under this article.

“Conviction” means a finding or verdict of guilty or a plea of guilty regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

“Criminal record” means any of the following:

Conviction of a crime;

Arrest, charge, and sentencing for a crime where:

A plea of nolo contendere was entered to the charge;

First offender treatment without adjudication of guilt pursuant to the charge was granted; or

Adjudication or sentence was otherwise withheld or not entered on the charge; or

Arrest and being charged for a crime if the charge is pending, unless the time for prosecuting such crime has expired pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 17.

“GCIC” means the Georgia Crime Information Center established under Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 35.

“GCIC information” means criminal history record information as defined in Code Section 35-3-30.

“Program” means a narcotic treatment program required to be licensed under this article.

“Records check application” means fingerprints in such form and of such quality as prescribed by the Georgia Crime Information Center and under standards adopted by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and a records search fee to be established by the department by rule and regulation, payable in such form as the department may direct to cover the cost of obtaining criminal background information pursuant to this Code section.

Prior to approving any license for a new program and periodically as established by the department by rules and regulations, the department shall require an administrator and applicant to submit a records check application. The department shall establish a uniform method of obtaining an administrator’s and applicant’s records check application.

Unless the department contracts pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the department shall transmit to the GCIC the fingerprints and records search fee from each fingerprint records check application in accordance with Code Section 35-3-35. Upon receipt thereof, the GCIC shall promptly transmit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall promptly conduct a search of its records and records to which it has access. Within ten days after receiving fingerprints acceptable to the GCIC and the fee, the GCIC shall notify the department in writing of any criminal record or if there is no such finding. After a search of Federal Bureau of Investigation records and fingerprints and upon receipt of the bureau’s report, the department shall make a determination about an administrator’s and applicant’s criminal record and shall notify the administrator or applicant in writing as to the department’s determination as to whether such administrator or applicant has or does not have a criminal record.

The department may either perform criminal background checks under agreement with the GCIC or contract with the GCIC and appropriate law enforcement agencies which have access to the GCIC and the Federal Bureau of Investigation information to have those agencies perform for the department criminal background checks for administrators and applicants. The department or the appropriate law enforcement agencies may charge reasonable fees for performing criminal background checks.

The department’s determination regarding an administrator’s or an applicant’s criminal record, or any action by the department revoking or refusing to grant a license based on such determination, shall constitute a contested case for purposes of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” except that any hearing required to be held pursuant thereto may be held reasonably expeditiously after such determination or action by the department.

Neither the GCIC, the department, any law enforcement agency, nor the employees of any such entities shall be responsible for the accuracy of information nor have any liability for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any dissemination of information or determination based thereon pursuant to this Code section.

All information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation or the GCIC shall be for the exclusive purpose of approving or denying the granting of a license to a new program and shall not be released or otherwise disclosed to any other person or agency. All such information collected by the department shall be maintained by the department pursuant to laws regarding and the rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the GCIC, as is applicable. Penalties for the unauthorized release or disclosure of any such information shall be as prescribed pursuant to laws regarding and rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the GCIC, as is applicable.

The requirements of this Code section are supplemental to any requirements for a license application or other requirements imposed by this article.

The department shall promulgate written rules and regulations reasonable and necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2017, paragraphs (5), (6) and (7) were arranged in alphabetical order.

26-5-62.
Effectiveness of existing regulations.

Unless otherwise provided, this article shall not invalidate or affect any rules or regulations which were in effect on May 4, 2017, promulgated pursuant to authority given by law, and such rules and regulations shall remain in force until repealed, replaced, or invalidated.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 1/SB 88.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2017, “on May 4, 2017,” was substituted for “upon its effective date,” in this Code section.